Maryland, session 2026, HB1402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
5–312.
(A) ON RECEIPT OF NOTICE THAT A DECEASED INDIVIDUAL WAS MUSLIM, A
MEDICAL EXAMINER SHALL RELEASE THE BODY OF THE DECEASED INDIVIDUAL
WITHIN 48 HOURS AFTER THE COMPLETION OF THE AUTOPSY.
(B) A MEDICAL EXAMINER IS DEEMED TO HAVE RECEIVED NOTICE THAT A
DECEASED INDIVIDUAL WAS MUSLIM IF THE MEDICAL EXAMINER IS PROVIDED
WITH:
(1) THE WILL OF THE DECEASED;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1402*

HOUSE BILL 1402
(2) A DOCUMENT EXECUTED UNDER § 5–509 OF THIS TITLE;
(3) NOTICE FROM THE DECEASED’S NEXT OF KIN;
(4) CONFIRMATION FROM AN IMAM OR A MOSQUE TO WHICH THE
DECEASED WAS KNOWN; OR
(5) INFORMATION REGARDING PREVIOUSLY ESTABLISHED FUNERAL
ARRANGEMENTS MADE WITH A PERSON AUTHORIZED TO OVERSEE AND CARRY OUT
THE BURIAL RITES OF A DECEASED MUSLIM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.